Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.15.020

Access to reports—Legislative intent. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that the commission provide the general public timely access to all contribution and expenditure reports submitted by candidates, continuing political committees, bona fide political parties, lobbyists, and lobbyists' employers. The legislature finds that failure to meet goals for full and timely disclosure threatens to undermine our electoral process.

Furthermore, the legislature intends for the commission to consult with Washington technology solutions as it seeks to implement chapter 401, Laws of 1999, and that the commission follow the standards and procedures established by Washington technology solutions in chapter 43.105 RCW as they relate to information technology.

[ 2024 c 164 s 405; 2024 c 54 s 39; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 732; 1999 c 401 s 1. Formerly RCW 42.17A.060, 42.17.460.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 732: "Section 732 of this act takes effect January 1, 2012." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 1015.]

Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See note following RCW 43.19.003.